North Carolina, session 2025, HB418.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding the following new sections to read:
"§ 115C-81.95. Elementary performing arts education.
Each local school administrative unit shall provide all students in kindergarten through grade
five instruction in music, dance, or theatre arts that aligns with the Standard Course of Study.
The instruction shall meet at least the following criteria:
(1) Occur during at least one instructional day out of every five instructional days.
(2) Be taught by at least one licensed music, dance, or theatre arts education
instructor.
(3) Instructional sessions shall last at least 30 consecutive minutes.
(4) Instructional sessions shall be given to classes no larger than the maximum
classroom size per instructional session for each grade, as provided in
G.S. 115C-301.
"§ 115C-81.96. Elementary visual arts education.
Each local school administrative unit shall provide all students in kindergarten through grade
five instruction in the visual arts that aligns with the Standard Course of Study. The instruction
shall meet at least the following criteria:
(1) Occur during at least one instructional day out of every five instructional days.
(2) Be taught by at least one licensed visual arts education instructor.
(3) Instructional sessions shall last at least 30 consecutive minutes.
(4) Instructional sessions shall be given to classes no larger than the maximum
classroom size per instructional session for each grade, as provided in
G.S. 115C-301."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 school year.
*H418-v-1*